Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 5. Civil Air Patrol

§ 10-3-501.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 19, chapter 15.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 151, §§ 1 through 3, pertained to the civil air patrol.

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

Transfer. —

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 3, provides that all supplies and equipment of the civil air patrol owned by the state of Wyoming are transferred to the military department, and all funds dedicated for the purposes of the civil air patrol are transferred from the department of transportation to the military department for the purposes of this act.

§ 10-3-502.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 2.

§ 10-3-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 2.